Louisiana, session 2026, SB289.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 44:3.7 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3.7. Certain records of public postsecondary education institutions
A. Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to require the disclosure
of records, or the information contained therein, held by a public postsecondary
education institution, which records are:
(1) Applications, resumes, or the personally identifiable information of
an applicant for president, chancellor, senior vice chancellor, or athletic coach
at the public postsecondary education institution, unless the applicant has
authorized the disclosure of such records and information. This exemption shall
expire once an applicant is approved for the position by the governing board,
at which time the records of the top three finalists, including the approved
applicant, shall become public. This exemption shall continue for any applicant
that is not among the top three finalists for the position, unless the applicant has
authorized the disclosure of such records and information.
(2) Any portion of a record that identifies the name of a donor to the
public postsecondary education institution or its affiliated foundation if the
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 289 ENROLLED
donor has requested that his name remain confidential.
(3) Records that contain proprietary, unpublished, or incomplete
academic research and unsubmitted grant applications. This exception shall
expire upon the disclosure, publication, public announcement, or public
knowledge of the research or the grant application, upon the submission of the
related grant application, or upon the grant or denial of related intellectual
property rights.
(4)(a) Records of negotiations for industry partnerships with the
institution upon a determination by the custodian of records that disclosure of
the information would have a detrimental effect on the negotiations. The
custodian's determination shall be disclosed in response to a request for the
records.
(b) No information made confidential pursuant to this Paragraph shall
remain confidential for more than twelve months from the date of the
custodian's determination that disclosure would be detrimental; however, if the
negotiation remains active and the custodian makes a new determination that
the disclosure of the information would be detrimental to the negotiations, such
information shall remain confidential while the negotiation remains active, not
to exceed an additional six months.
B. This Chapter shall not apply to the personally identifiable information
of any person who reports a violation of a student code of conduct or other
policy intended for the safety of students or employees of a postsecondary
education institution, personally identifiable information of any reported
witness to the reported violation, and, if the reported violation involves violence
or abuse, personally identifiable information of any person who may be a victim
of violence or abuse directly related to the reported violation if such information
is in the custody or control of the postsecondary education institution or
management board and was received in accordance with adopted, written
policies applicable to the postsecondary education institution and the students
and employees of the postsecondary education institution, unless access to the
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 289 ENROLLED
information is specifically required by other provisions of law of this state or by
federal law or is ordered by a court under rules of discovery.
Section 2. R.S. 44:4(56) is hereby repealed.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.